Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,172
Nonresident licensee or permit holder; conviction within state; director; duties.

(1) Within ten days after a conviction of any nonresident who holds a commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license for any violation of state law or local ordinance related to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle operated in this state, the director shall notify the driver licensing authority which licensed the nonresident who holds a commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license and the Commercial Driver License Information System of such conviction.

(2)(a) Within ten days after disqualifying a nonresident who holds a commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license or canceling, revoking, or suspending the commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license held by a nonresident, for a period of at least sixty days, the department shall notify the driver licensing authority which licensed the nonresident and the Commercial Driver License Information System of such action.

(b) The notification shall include both the disqualification and the violation that resulted in the disqualification, cancellation, revocation, or suspension. The notification and the information it provides shall be recorded on the driver's record.

(3) Within ten days after a conviction of any nonresident who holds a commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license for any violation of state law or local ordinance related to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, committed in any type of motor vehicle operated in this state, the director shall notify the driver licensing authority which licensed the nonresident and the Commercial Driver License Information System of such conviction.

(4) Within ten days after a conviction of any nonresident who holds a driver's license for any violation of state law or local ordinance related to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle operated in this state, the director shall notify the driver licensing authority which licensed the nonresident.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 122;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 19;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 53;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 32.